Maine, session 132, LD1775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Finance Authority of Maine to issue revenue bonds. In accordance
with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 962, subsection 2 and section 969-A,
subsection 5, the Finance Authority of Maine may issue up to $87,000,000 in revenue
bonds to provide funds to county jails for the purposes stated in section 4.
Sec. 2. Not debt of State. Bonds issued pursuant to section 1, including any notes
or other evidences of indebtedness or obligations designated as bonds issued pursuant to
section 1, may not be considered to be a debt of the State or a pledge of the full faith and
credit of the State. All bonds issued pursuant to section 1 must have a statement on their
face that the State is not obligated to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds and that the
full faith and credit of the State is not pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest
or premium on the bonds.
Sec. 3. Repayment. Repayment of the bonds must be started by July 1, 2026. The
bonds must be fully repaid no later than June 30, 2036. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, of the funds needed to repay the bonds issued pursuant to section 1,
50% must be derived from amounts received pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
28-A, section 90 and 50% must be derived from the opioid settlement funds received
pursuant to the Memoranda of Understanding, as defined in Title 5, section 203-C,
subsection 1, paragraph C, and deposited into the Maine Recovery Fund, as defined in Title
5, section 203-C, subsection 1, paragraph B. Bonds issued pursuant to section 1 are deemed
to be an approved use, as defined in Title 5, section 203-C, subsection 1, paragraph A. If
either funding source under this section is determined to expire before the expiration of the
bonds issued pursuant to section 1, an appropriate amount from the expiring funding source
must be escrowed to ensure repayment of the bonds.
Sec. 4. Distribution and use of funds from bonds. Funds from the sale of bonds
issued pursuant to section 1 must be allocated by the Finance Authority of Maine, after
consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections, on a pro rata
population basis to county jails and to jails used as holding facilities for the detention of
adult residents, whether the residents are detained pending a trial or other court proceeding
or sentenced for periods of up to 72 hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays
and excluding days during which a resident is at court.
Funds must be used improve county jails and holding facilities to allow jails or holding
facilities to accommodate residents with a substance use disorder and assist those residents
in obtaining treatment and recovery and to supplement the needs of jails and holding
facilities that have potential funding shortfalls.